Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2956.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. State lands; leases; public auction; delayed repeal A. Notwithstanding any other law, a person that leases state land for commercial purposes may apply to purchase the parcel if the person does not lease the parcel for the purposes of solar or wind energy.  A lessee may submit a single application for multiple parcels that are leased by the applicant or submit a separate application for each desired leased parcel. B. A lessee that wishes to purchase a parcel pursuant to subsection A of this section may apply to the state land commissioner to initiate a public auction for the leased parcel. Within ninety days after receipt of the application, the state land commissioner shall appraise, advertise and sell the parcel at public auction to the highest and best bidder.  If an applicant's lease on the parcel expires or if an applicant renews the lease during the ninety-day time frame and the applicant does not withdraw the application, the state land commissioner shall proceed with the auction of the parcel consistent with the ninety-day time frame. C. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027.